District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0803.
BE IT ENACTED·B Y THE COUNCll. OF TIIE DIS.TRICT OF COLUMBIA, tha.t this
23 act may be cited as ffie ''Umfmm .Assigmmm.t for Bene-fit o:f Q:editou Act of2 -026_ .....
24 Sec. 2. Subtitle Il o,f'fiitle 28 oft he District ofCohmilii.a official Code is amended as
2S
26 (a) The· table ofooments for the title is amended as :follicm"S.:
27 (1) Strike the pmase ..2 1. Ass~gmnent fm·B enefit of Creditors ... §§ 21-.:n 01-
28, 2110"; and
2.9 (2) .Add the pmase "22. A.s.sigmnent :fm·t he Benefit afQ :editms; Uniform. Ad. ...
30
31 ~) Chapter 21 iis repealed.
32
33 (c) A new Chapter 22 is. added to,r e.ad as follmlrs:
34
35 '"CHAPTEt.22: ASSIGNiMENTFOR. THE BENEFIT OF CREDITORS; UNIFORM
36 ACT.
1

37 “28-2201. Short title.
38 “28-2202. Definitions.
39 “28-2203. Scope.
40 “28-2204. Requirements for assignee and assignment agreement.
41 “28-2205. Effect of assignment; when assignment agreement effective.
42 “28-2206. Filing, recording, and title transfer requirements.
43 “28-2207. Notification to creditors.
44 “28-2208. Duties of assignor.
45 “28-2209. Duties of assignee.
46 “28-2210. Powers of assignee
47 “28-2211. Allowed claim.
48 “28-2212. Disputed and disallowed claims.
49 “28-2213. Proof of claim.
50 “28-2214. Rights of transferees.
51 “28-2215. Distributions.
52 “28-2216. Claim subordination.
53 “28-2217. Liability.
54 “28-2218. Assignee removal; successor assignee.
55 “28-2219. Winding up.
56 “28-2220. Interstate matters.
57 “28-2221. Court action.
58 “28-2222. Ancillary assignee.
59 “28-2223. Provisions variable by agreement.
2

60 “28-2224. Uniformity of application and construction.
61 “28-2225. Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.
62 “28-2226. Transitional provision.
63 “CHAPTER 22: ASSIGNMENT FOR THE BENEFIT OF C.REDITORS; UNIFORM ACT
64 “§ 28-2201. Short title.
65 “This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Assignment for Benefit of Creditors Act of
66 2026”.
67 “§ 28-2202. Definitions.
68 “In this chapter:
69 “(1) “Affiliate” means:
70 “(A) A person that directly or indirectly owns, controls, or holds, with
71 power to vote, 20 percent or more of the outstanding voting interests of another person, other
72 than a person that holds the interests:
73 “(i) In a fiduciary or agency capacity without sole discretionary
74 power to vote the interests; or
75 “(ii) Solely to secure a debt, if the person has not in fact exercised
76 the power to vote;
77 “(B) A person with 20 percent or more of the person’s outstanding voting
78 interests directly or indirectly owned, controlled, or held, with power to vote, by another person;
79 “(C) A person whose business is operated under a lease or operating
80 agreement by another person, or a person substantially all of whose assets are controlled by the
81 other person; or
82 “(D) A person that operates the business or substantially all the assets of
3

83 another person under a lease or operating agreement.
84 “(2) “Asset” means a legal or equitable interest in property of an assignor,
85 regardless of the person holding or in possession, custody, or control of the property or where the
86 property is located. The term does not include:
87 “(A) A legal or equitable interest in property restricted from assignment if
88 the restriction is effective under other law, unless the other law permits assignment with the
89 consent of another person and the person consents to the assignment in a manner permitted by
90 the other law; or
91 “(B) If the assignor is an individual, a legal or equitable interest in
92 property to the extent it is exempt from legal process under other law.
93 “(3) “Assigned asset” means an asset transferred under an assignment.
94 “(4) “Assignee” means a person to which assets are transferred under an
95 assignment.
96 “(5) “Assignment” means a transfer by a person of all the person’s assets to
97 another person for the benefit of the transferor’s creditors.
98 “(6) “Assignment agreement” means an agreement that transfers or provides for a
99 transfer of all the assignor’s assets.
100 “(7) “Assignment estate” means the assets held at a given time by the assignee
101 under an assignment.
102 “(8) “Assignor” means a person whose assets are transferred under an assignment.
103 “(9) “Claim” means a creditor’s right to payment or to an equitable remedy,
104 regardless of whether the right is reduced to judgment, liquidated, unliquidated, fixed,
105 contingent, matured, unmatured, disputed, undisputed, legal, equitable, secured, or unsecured.
4

106 “(10) “Cohabitant” means each of two individuals not married to each other who
107 live together as a couple after each has reached the age of majority or been emancipated.
108 “(11) “Creditor” means a person that has a claim against an assigned asset or the
109 assignor.
110 “(12) “District” means the District of Columbia.
111 “(13) “Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital,
112 magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.
113 “(14) “Good faith” means honesty in fact and the observance of reasonable
114 commercial standards of fair dealing.
115 ”(15) Insider” includes:
116 “(A) In the case of an individual:
117 “(i) A relative of the individual;
118 “(ii) A partnership or limited liability company in which the
119 individual is a general partner or managing member; or
120 “(iii) An organization of which the individual is a director, officer,
121 or person in control;
122 “(B) In the case of an organization:
123 “(i) A director, officer, manager, or other person in control of or
124 with controlling equity interest in the organization;
125 “(ii) A partnership or limited liability company in which the
126 organization is a general partner or managing member;
127 “(iii) A general partner or managing member of the organization;
128 or
5

129 “(iv) A relative of a general partner, managing member, director,
130 officer, manager, or other person in control of or with controlling equity interest in the
131 organization;
132 “(C) An affiliate; or
133 “(D) A managing agent of an organization.
134 “(16) “Lien” means an interest in an asset that secures payment or performance of
135 an obligation.
136 “(17) “Organization” means a person other than an individual.
137 “(18) “Perfected lien” means a lien on:
138 “(A) Real property other than fixtures on which a bona fide purchaser of
139 the property cannot acquire an interest superior to the interest of the lienholder; or
140 “(B) Fixtures or property other than real property on which a creditor
141 cannot acquire a lien by attachment, levy, or the like that is superior to the interest of the
142 lienholder.
143 “(19) “Person” means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit entity,
144 government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or other legal entity. The
145 term includes a protected series, however denominated, of an entity if the protected series is
146 established under law that limits, or limits if conditions specified under law are satisfied, the
147 ability of a creditor of the entity or of any other protected series of the entity to satisfy a claim
148 from assets of the protected series.
149 “(20) “Proof of claim” means a record a creditor submits to an assignee to
150 evidence the creditor’s claim.
151 “(21) “Record” means information:
6

152 “(A) Inscribed on a tangible medium; or
153 “(B) Stored in an electronic or other medium and retrievable in
154 perceivable form.
155 “(22) “Relative” means an individual related by affinity or consanguinity within
156 the third degree or a cohabitant.
157 “(23) “Security interest” means a lien created by an agreement.
158 “(24) “Send”, in connection with a record or notification, means:
159 “(A) To deposit in the mail, deliver for transmission, or transmit by any
160 other usual means of communication, with postage or cost of transmission provided for,
161 addressed to any address reasonable under the circumstances; or
162 “(B) To cause the record or notification to be received within the time it
163 would have been received if properly sent under subparagraph (A).
164 “(25) “Sign” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record, to:
165 “(A) Execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or
166 “(B) Attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol,
167 sound, or process.
168 “(26) “State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto
169 Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any other territory or possession subject to the
170 jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes a federally recognized Indian tribe.
171 “(27) “Transfer” means to dispose of or part with an asset or with an interest in an
172 asset, regardless of whether the disposition or parting is indirect, conditional, or involunta
173 “§ 28-2203. Scope.
174 “This chapter applies to an assignment made by an assignor that is:
7

175 “(1) An organization whose principal place of business is in the District;
176 “(2) An organization whose internal affairs are governed by other law of the
177 District;
178 “(3) An individual whose principal residence is in the District;
179 “(4) An organization wholly owned, directly or indirectly, by an assignor that
180 satisfies paragraph (1), (2), or (3); or
181 “(5) An organization that:
182 “(A) Is partly owned, directly or indirectly, and controlled by an assignor
183 that satisfies paragraph (1), (2), or (3);
184 “(B) Has no place of business or employees; and
185 “(C) Relies on the services the organization receives from an assignor that
186 satisfies paragraph (1), (2), or (3).
187 “§ 28-2204. Requirements for assignee and assignment agreement.
188 “(a) An assignee must be a person that:
189 “(1) Is not a creditor, affiliate, or insider of the assignor;
190 “(2) Is not an affiliate or insider of a creditor of the assignor;
191 “(3) Does not have a claim against the assignment estate, other than a claim for
192 fees and expenses to be paid under the assignment agreement;
193 “(4) Does not have a material financial interest in the outcome of the assignment,
194 other than a claim for fees and expenses to be paid under the assignment agreement;
195 “(5) Does not hold an equity interest in the assignor other than a noncontrolling
196 interest in a publicly traded company; and
197 “(6) Is not an affiliate of a person that fails to satisfy paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), or
8

198 (5).
199 “(b) A person that satisfies subsection (a) is not precluded from being an assignee merely
200 because the person performed services for the assignor before the assignment.
201 “(c) An assignment agreement must be in a record signed by the assignor and the
202 assignee. The record must:
203 “(1) State the name and address of the assignor and of the assignee;
204 “(2) Transfer or provide for a transfer of all the assignor’s assets;
205 “(3) Describe the assigned assets in sufficient detail to identify the assets;
206 “(4) Provide for the distribution of the assignment estate;
207 “(5) Describe the fees to be charged by the assignee in connection with the
208 assignment, including the basis on which they are to be calculated; and
209 “(6) Include a representation by the assignor, under penalty of perjury, that the
210 assignor is assigning all the assignor’s assets.
211 “(d) If an assignee relies in good faith on the assignor’s representation made under
212 subsection (c)(6), all the assignor’s assets are deemed to be assigned, even if the representation is
213 inaccurate.
214 “§ 28-2205. Effect of assignment; when assignment agreement effective.
215 “(a) An assignee obtains the rights, title, and interests of the assignor in the assigned
216 assets.
217 “(b) If the assignor is an organization, an assignee obtains the rights, title, and interests of
218 the assignor in assets acquired after the assignment.
219 “(c) Except as provided in § 28-2210(b)(12), an assignee takes each assigned asset
220 subject to an existing interest in the asset held by another person.
9

221 “(d) An assignee holds the assigned assets subject to the assignee’s duties under § 28-
222 2209.
223 “(e) An assignment is subject to other law under which the assignment may be fraudulent
224 or otherwise voidable.
225 “(f) The effective date of an assignment agreement is the date the agreement is signed by
226 the last party to the agreement that is required to sign the agreement unless a later date is
227 identified in the agreement as the effective date.
228 “§ 28-2206. Filing, recording, and title transfer requirements.
229 “(a) In this section, “financing statement” has the meaning in D.C. Code § 28:9-
230 102(a)(39).
231 “(b) An assignee of a legal or equitable interest in personal property may file a financing
232 statement in the filing office of:
233 “(1) The District established for purposes of D.C. Code § 28:9-501(a)(2);
234 “(2) Any other state in which:
235 “(A) The assignor would be located under D.C. Code § 28:9-307 if the
236 assignor were a debtor for the purpose of that section; or
237 “(B) An asset of the assignment estate may be located.
238 “(c) A financing statement filed under subsection (b) must indicate that it is filed in
239 connection with an assignment.
240 “(d) When filing a financing statement under subsection (b), the assignee shall:
241 “(1) Attach a copy of the assignment agreement to the financing statement; or
242 “(2) State on the financing statement that a copy of the assignment agreement is
243 available on request to the assignee.
10

244 “(e) A financing statement filed under subsection (b) may:
245 “(1) Designate the assignor as “debtor” and the assignee as “secured party”; or
246 “(2) Use the terms “assignor” and “assignee” or words of similar import.
247 “(f) The filing of a financing statement under subsection (b) is not itself a factor in
248 determining whether an asset secures an obligation. The rights of the assignee under the
249 assignment are not affected if the assignee does not file a financing statement under subsection
250 (b).
251 “(g) An assignee of a legal or equitable interest in real property shall record the
252 assignment of the interest or notice of the assignment under the real estate recording law of the
253 jurisdiction where the property is located.
254 “(h) An assignee shall comply with other law governing the transfer of title to an asset.
255 “(i) By signing an assignment agreement, the assignor authorizes the assignee to take the
256 actions required by this section.
257 “§ 28-2207. Notification to creditors.
258 “(a) Unless a creditor waives in a signed record the right to notification, an assignee shall
259 send a notification of the assignment to each creditor known to the assignee within a reasonable
260 time not to exceed 30 days after the effective date of the assignment agreement.
261 “(b) The notification must:
262 “(1) Be in a record signed by the assignee;
263 “(2) Include the assignee’s name, address, and other contact information
264 reasonably necessary to communicate with the assignee;
265 “(3) Provide reasonable instructions for submitting a proof of claim using the
266 method established by the assignee under § 28-2209(b)(5); and
11

267 “(4) Identify the date established under § 28-2209(b)(6) by which each creditor
268 whose claim is not otherwise allowed without a timely proof of claim under this chapter must
269 submit a proof of claim.
270 “(c) An assignee shall use reasonable means to provide the information in subsection (b)
271 to unknown creditors, including by any means the assignor regularly used to:
272 “(1) Provide information to the assignor’s creditors; or
273 “(2) Communicate information about the assignor, other than advertising, to the
274 public.
275 “§ 28-2208. Duties of assignor.
276 “(a) Subject to § 28-2223, an assignor has a duty to take all reasonable actions necessary
277 for the assignee to administer the assignment, the assigned assets, and the assignment estate.
278 “(b) In furtherance of the duty under subsection (a), the assignor shall:
279 “(1) Preserve and turn over to the assignee the assigned assets in the assignor’s
280 possession or control;
281 “(2) Provide to the assignee information reasonably necessary to administer the
282 assignment, the assigned assets, and the assignment estate;
283 “(3) Sign any record reasonably necessary to transfer an assigned asset and
284 comply with any notarization required under other law;
285 “(4) Designate, and provide the assignee with the name, address, and other
286 contact information reasonably necessary to communicate with, an appropriate person willing
287 and able to act as a representative on behalf of the assignor as may be reasonably necessary to
288 administer the assignment, the assigned assets, and the assignment estate;
289 “(5) If the assignment includes a legal or equitable interest in real property or
12

290 titled personal property, cooperate with the assignee in taking actions under § 28-2206;
291 “(6) On or as soon as practicable after the effective date of the assignment
292 agreement, provide the assignee:
293 “(A) A list of all assets;
294 “(B) A list of all the assignor’s employees, including those whose
295 employment is terminated in connection with the assignment; and
296 “(C) A list of all the assignor’s known creditors, including, for each
297 creditor, the creditor’s address and other contact information reasonably necessary to
298 communicate with the creditor;
299 “(7) Verify under penalty of perjury the accuracy of the lists required under
300 paragraph (6);
301 “(8) With respect to a legal or equitable interest in property restricted from
302 assignment, cooperate with the assignee to obtain consent from a person whose consent to assign
303 the interest is necessary under other law; and
304 “(9) Provide assistance to the assignee as required by the assignment agreement.
305 “(c) The duties in this section also apply to a representative designated under subsection
306 (b)(4).
307 "§ 28-2209. Duties of Assignee.
308 “(a) Subject to § 28-2223, an assignee has a fiduciary duty to the assignment estate for
309 the benefit of creditors:
310 “(1) Of loyalty, including the duty to manage the assignment in good faith;
311 “(2) To use reasonable care to maximize distributions under § 28-2215; and
312 “(3) to wind up the assignment under § 28-2219 in a manner compatible with the
13

313 best interests of the assignment estate and creditors.
314 “(b) Without limitation on the duties under subsection (a), and subject to § 28-2223, the
315 assignee also has a duty to:
316 “(1) Maintain a separate deposit account for funds related to the assignment;
317 “(2) Collect on or dispose of each assigned asset, unless the assignee determines it
318 is more economically efficient to abandon the asset;
319 “(3) Prepare and retain appropriate business records, including a record of each
320 receipt, disbursement, and collection on or disposition of an assigned asset;
321 “(4) Pay administrative expenses of the assignment estate, to the extent the
322 assignment estate has sufficient unencumbered assets;
323 “(5) Establish a method that is reasonably designed to permit a creditor to submit
324 a proof of claim;
325 “(6) Establish a single date by which creditors whose claims are not otherwise
326 allowed without timely proofs of claim under this chapter must submit proofs of claim, which
327 must be not less than 90 days and not more than 210 days after the effective date of the
328 assignment agreement;
329 “(7) Unless a claim would receive minimal or no distribution without regard to
330 the claim’s validity or asserted priority, examine the validity and priority of claims against the
331 assignment estate and, if necessary, consult with the representative designated by the assignor
332 under § 28-2208(b)(4);
333 “(8) At least every six months, provide to each creditor a summary of the assets,
334 liabilities, and expenses of the assignment estate;
335 “(9) Comply with all requirements of the Internal Revenue Service and District
14

336 taxing authorities;
337 “(10) Send a notification to each creditor of the assignee’s compensation and any
338 change in the method of determining the assignee’s compensation from the method provided in
339 the assignment agreement;
340 “(11) Send a final accounting under § 28-2219(a); and
341 “(12) Comply with the other requirements imposed on the assignee under this
342 chapter.
343 “§ 28-2210. Powers of assignee.
344 “(a) An assignee has the powers necessary or appropriate to perform the assignee’s
345 duties.
346 “(b) Unless the assignment agreement expressly provides otherwise, the assignee has
347 power to:
348 “(1) Operate an existing business that uses an assigned asset, including
349 preservation of the asset and collection on, or the sale, lease, license, or other disposition of, the
350 asset;
351 “(2) Incur secured or unsecured debt and pay expenses incidental to the exercise
352 of the power under paragraph (1);
353 “(3) Assert a right, claim, cause of action, or defense the assignor could have
354 asserted that relates to the assignment estate;
355 “(4) Engage professionals, including a professional previously engaged by the
356 assignor, to give advice, to prosecute or defend litigation, or for other purposes as the assignee
357 considers appropriate, and pay professionals reasonable fees for services from the assignment
358 estate;
15

359 “(5) Collect on, or sell, lease, license, or otherwise dispose of, an asset of the
360 assignment estate regardless of whether the asset is subject to a lien or other encumbrance;
361 “(6) Exercise a right to redeem an asset of the assignment estate that is subject to
362 a mortgage, deed of trust, security interest, or other encumbrance;
363 “(7) Settle a matter involving a debtor of the assignor;
364 “(8) Prosecute or defend a litigation pending on the effective date of the
365 assignment agreement in favor of or against the assignor in the manner and with the same effect
366 as the assignor could have done if the assignment had not been made;
367 “(9) Recover an asset in the manner and with the same effect as the assignor could
368 have done if the assignment had not been made;
369 “(10) Settle claims against the assignment estate;
370 “(11) Abandon an assigned asset;
371 “(12) Subject to subsections (c) and (e), avoid a transfer or the incurrence of an
372 obligation which a creditor that has filed a proof of claim could have avoided under other law if
373 the assignment had not been made; and
374 “(13) Invest funds, subject to applicable prudent investor standards under other
375 law.
376 “(c) The power under subsection (b)(12) is exclusive to the assignee with respect to a
377 creditor that submits a proof of claim. A recovery by the assignee in the exercise of this power
378 must be for the benefit of the assignment estate but may not exceed the amount, asset, or other
379 value the creditor could have obtained by the avoidance.
380 “(d) For the purpose of exercising the assignee’s power under subsection (b)(12),
381 exercising a voidable-transaction remedy, or otherwise establishing the priority of the assignee’s
16

382 interest, an assignee has a lien on the assignment estate and the status of:
383 “(1) A lien creditor under D.C. Code § 28:9-102(a)(52)(B) as to an asset that is a
384 legal or equitable interest in personal property or fixtures;
385 “(2) A bona fide purchaser as to an asset that is a legal or equitable interest in real
386 property, other than fixtures, located in the District; and
387 “(3) A bona fide purchaser under the law of another state as to an asset that is a
388 legal or equitable interest in real property, other than fixtures, located in the other state.
389 “(e) An assignee’s power under subsection (b)(12) to avoid a transfer made before the
390 effective date of the assignment agreement, under or in connection with a swap agreement,
391 securities contract, commodity contract, forward contract, repurchase agreement, or master
392 netting agreement, is limited to the extent a trustee would not have the power to avoid the
393 transfer under the Bankruptcy Code, 11 U.S.C. Section 101 et seq.
394 “(f) An assignee shall exercise the powers under this section consistent with the
395 assignee’s fiduciary duty under § 28-2209(a).
396 “§ 28-2211. Allowed claim.
397 “(a) An assignee shall allow a creditor’s claim if:
398 “(1) The creditor submits a proof of claim in compliance with § 28-2213; and
399 “(2) The assignee does not dispute the claim under § 28-2212 before final
400 distribution.
401 “(b) An assignee may:
402 “(1) Allow a claim, pay a known liquidated claim, or accept a notice to the
403 assignee of a claim received by the date established by the assignee under § 28-2209(b)(6) even
404 if the creditor does not submit a proof of claim; or
17

405 “(2) Allow and pay a claim evidenced by a late-filed proof of claim, if the
406 assignee determines there is a reasonable basis for excusing the late filing.
407 “(c) Any unsecured portion of an allowed claim shall be valued as of the effective date of
408 the assignment agreement.
409 “(d) A creditor’s claim is allowed if the creditor succeeds in a dispute under § 28-
410 2212(b).
411 “(e) Subject to subsection (f), after expiration of the time for submitting a proof of claim,
412 the assignee shall create a complete list of creditors that have submitted a proof of claim in
413 compliance with § 28-2213. For each creditor’s claim, the list must state:
414 “(1) The amount of the claim, if the amount is known to the assignee; and
415 “(2) Whether the claim is secured or unsecured and, if secured, describe the
416 collateral for the claim.
417 “(f) If a class of creditors will receive no distribution on account of allowed claims, the
418 assignee shall send a notice in a record to each creditor in that class that the creditor will receive
419 no distribution instead of the list required in subsection (e).
420 “(g) If requested by a creditor or other party with an interest in the assignment estate, the
421 assignee shall provide the list created under subsection (e) to the person making the request to
422 the extent permitted by privacy laws and subject to any privacy safeguards the assignee
423 determines in the assignee’s business judgment are reasonably necessary.
424 “§ 28-2212. Disputed and disallowed claims.
425 “(a) An assignee may dispute a creditor’s claim before final distribution by sending
426 notification in a record stating the nature of the assignee’s dispute to the creditor.
427 “(b) If a dispute cannot be resolved consensually, the assignee may commence a
18

428 proceeding under § 28-2221 to disallow the claim. The assignee must commence the proceeding
429 before final distribution under § 28-2215. If the proceeding is not filed before final distribution,
430 the assignee shall allow the claim under § 28-2211.
431 “(c) An assignee shall create a dollar-for-dollar reserve for the estimated amount of the
432 potential distribution on a disputed claim.
433 “(d) Subject to subsection (b), an assignee shall disallow a claim for reimbursement or
434 contribution of a person that is liable with the assignor on, or that has secured, the claim, to the
435 extent:
436 “(1) The claim against the assignment estate is disallowed;
437 “(2) The claim for reimbursement or contribution is contingent as of the time of
438 allowance or disallowance; or
439 “(3) The person asserts a right of subrogation to the rights of a creditor.
440 “(e) A claim for reimbursement or contribution of a person liable with the assignor on, or
441 that has secured, the claim that becomes fixed after the effective date of the assignment
442 agreement must be determined, and must be allowed or disallowed, subject to subsection (b), as
443 if the claim had become fixed before the effective date of the assignment agreement.
444 “(f) An assignee may reconsider the assignee’s decision to allow or disallow a claim for
445 cause. If a reconsidered claim is allowed under § 28-2211, before the assignee makes additional
446 payments or transfers to other creditors that are equal or junior in priority under § 28-2215 to the
447 reconsidered claim, the creditor with the reconsidered claim must receive a payment or transfer
448 in an amount proportionate in value to the payments or transfers already received by the other
449 creditors. This subsection does not modify the assignee’s right under other law to recover from a
450 creditor an excess payment or transfer made to the creditor. If a reconsidered claim is disallowed,
19

451 the assignee shall comply with subsections (b) and (c).
452 “§ 28-2213. Proof of claim.
453 “(a) A proof of claim must:
454 “(1) State the name, address, and other contact information reasonably necessary
455 to communicate with the creditor;
456 “(2) State the amount of the claim;
457 “(3) Briefly state the nature of the claim;
458 “(4) Identify any asset of the assignment estate securing the claim;
459 “(5) Be signed by the creditor under penalty of perjury;
460 “(6) Include a copy of a record, if any, on which the claim is based;
461 “(7) Be submitted using the method established under § 28-2209(b)(5); and
462 “(8) Be submitted by the date established by the assignee under § 28-2209(b)(6).
463 “(b) A proof of claim submitted in compliance with this section is prima facie evidence
464 of the validity and amount of the claim.
465 “(c) The submission by a creditor of a proof of claim in compliance with this section
466 constitutes the creditor’s:
467 “(1) Consent to the jurisdiction of the court under § 28-2221; and
468 “(2) Assignment to the assignee of any right of the creditor to bring a voidable
469 transaction action relating to the creditor’s claim.
470 “§ 28-2214. Rights of transferees.
471 “(a) An assignee’s disposition of an asset:
472 “(1) Transfers to a transferee for value all of the assignee’s rights in the asset;
473 “(2) Discharges the assignee’s lien and, to the extent the assignment creates a
20

474 security interest in favor of the assignee, the assignee’s security interest; and
475 “(3) Discharges any subordinate security interest or other lien subordinate to the
476 assignee’s lien.
477 “(b) A transferee that acts in good faith takes free of the rights and interests described in
478 subsection (a), even if the assignee fails to comply with this chapter or the requirements of a
479 judicial proceeding.
480 “(c) If a transferee does not take free of the rights and interests described in subsection
481 (a), the transferee takes the asset subject to:
482 “(1) The assignee’s rights in the assets of the assignment estate;
483 “(2) The assignee’s lien and, if applicable, security interest; and
484 “(3) Any other security interest or other lien.
485 “(d) Unless otherwise provided in a record, any warranty arising by operation of other
486 law is disclaimed to the extent permitted by other law.
487 “(e) If a subordinate security interest or other lien is discharged under this section, the
488 assignee may file a record with the official or office responsible for maintaining an official filing,
489 recording, registration, or certificate-of-title system covering the asset secured by the security
490 interest or other lien. The record must state that the security interest or other lien is discharged as
491 a subordinate security interest or other lien in connection with a disposition under an assignment
492 for the benefit of creditors of the assignor whose asset is subject to the security interest or other
493 lien.
494 “§ 28-2215. Distributions.
495 “(a) In this section, “protected secured creditor” means a secured creditor whose lien:
496 “(1) Is a perfected lien;
21

497 “(2) Cannot be avoided by the assignee under § 28-2210(b)(12); and
498 “(3) Is not subordinate to the assignee’s lien.
499 “(b) Except as provided in § 28-2216, the assignee shall pay claims from the assignment
500 estate allowed under § 28-2211 in the order of priority stated in this section.
501 “(c) Unless otherwise agreed between the assignee and a protected secured creditor,
502 before distributions under subsections (d), (e), (f), and (g), and in accordance with the priorities
503 of creditors with liens under other law, the protected secured creditor shall receive the asset or
504 the proceeds from the collection on or disposition of the asset to the extent of the value of the
505 protected secured creditor’s interest in the asset, less the assignee’s reasonable and necessary
506 expenses of preserving or disposing of the asset to the extent the expenses benefit the protected
507 secured creditor and are incurred with the protected secured creditor’s consent or acquiescence.
508 The protected secured creditor has an unsecured claim under subsection (g)(2) for the amount of
509 the claim that remains after deducting the amount or value of an asset the protected secured
510 creditor receives under this subsection. To the extent a claim is secured by an asset the value of
511 which, after the deductions provided under this subsection, is greater than the amount of the
512 claim, the protected secured creditor may receive interest on the claim and any reasonable fees,
513 costs, or charges provided for under the agreement or other law under which the claim arose.
514 “(d) After the distributions under subsection (c), the assignee shall pay the necessary
515 costs of the administration of the assignment estate. The costs include:
516 “(1) Fees and reimbursements of the expenses of the assignee and any
517 professionals engaged by the assignee;
518 “(2) Post-assignment taxes incurred by the assignee;
519 “(3) Post-assignment rent incurred by the assignee in occupying premises on
22

520 which assets of the assignment estate are located or the business of the assignor is conducted;
521 “(4) Post-assignment lease payments incurred by the assignee in renting personal
522 property used in the business of the assignor; and
523 “(5) Amounts required to be paid under the assignment agreement for expenses of
524 winding up the assignment under § 28-2219.
525 “(e) After the distributions under subsections (c) and (d), the assignee shall pay claims
526 entitled to priority under federal law including under 31 U.S.C. Section 3713 from the
527 assignment estate.
528 “(f) After the distributions under subsections (c), (d), and (e), the assignee shall pay
529 claims from the assignment estate for wages, salaries, or commissions earned not more than 180
530 days before the earlier of the effective date of the assignment agreement or the cessation of the
531 assignor’s business. Payment is limited to the greater of:
532 “(1) The amount of the claim allowed as a priority claim ahead of claims of other
533 unsecured creditors under the Bankruptcy Code, 11 U.S.C. Section 101 et seq.; or
534 “(2) The amount allowed as a priority claim ahead of claims of other unsecured
535 creditors under applicable non-bankruptcy law.
536 “(g) After the distributions under subsections (c), (d), (e), and (f), each creditor shall
537 receive a distribution of the assets of the assignment estate in the following order of priority:
538 “(1) Unsecured claims entitled to priority ahead of claims of other unsecured
539 creditors under other law; and
540 “(2) Unsecured claims not entitled to priority.
541 “(h) If the assets available for distribution to claims with equal priority under subsection
542 (g) are insufficient to pay the total amount of the claims with that priority, each creditor with a
23

543 claim with that priority shall receive a pro rata distribution of the available assets based on the
544 proportion the amount of the creditor’s claim bears to the total amount of the claims with that
545 priority.
546 “(i) If the claims entitled to the distribution under subsections (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) are
547 paid in full, the residue shall be distributed to allowed claims evidenced by a late-filed proof of
548 claim, other than a late-filed claim allowed by the assignee under § 28-2211(b)(2), and, after the
549 allowed claims evidenced by a late-filed proof of claim have been paid in full, as provided in the
550 assignment agreement.
551 “(j) An assignee may make interim distributions after considering future expenses and the
552 reserves for disputed claims established under § 28-2212(c).
553 “§ 28-2216. Claim subordination.
554 “(a) A subordination agreement is enforceable under this chapter to the same extent the
555 agreement is enforceable under other law.
556 “(b) Subject to subsection (c), the following claims are subordinate to a claim or interest
557 that is senior or equal in priority to a claim or interest represented by a security or other equity
558 interest in the assignor or an affiliate of the assignor:
559 “(1) A claim arising from rescission of a purchase or sale of the security or other
560 equity interest;
561 “(2) A claim for damages arising from the purchase or sale of the security or other
562 equity interest; and
563 “(3) A claim for reimbursement or contribution allowed on account of the
564 rescission or damage claim.
565 “(c) If the security is common stock or another common equity interest, a claim subject to
24

566 subordination under subsection (b) has the same priority as common stock or another common
567 equity interest.
568 “§ 28-2217. Liability.
569 “(a) An assignor is not personally liable for an act or omission by the assignee.
570 “(b) An assignee is not personally liable for an act or omission by the assignor.
571 “(c) A representative designated by an assignor under § 28-2208(b)(4) is exculpated to
572 the same extent as a person acting on behalf of the assignor under other law had there been no
573 assignment, except for an act or omission resulting from the representative’s gross negligence or
574 willful misconduct.
575 “(d) A term of an assignment agreement relieving the assignee of liability is
576 unenforceable to the extent the agreement relieves the assignee of liability for an act or omission
577 committed in bad faith or with reckless indifference to the purposes of the assignment or the
578 interests of the creditors of the assignment estate.
579 “(e) Subject to subsection (f), an assignee is personally liable for breach of a fiduciary
580 duty under § 28-2209(a). If the assignee is liable:
581 “(1) The assignee is personally liable to a creditor for an individualized harm to
582 the creditor if the harm is not shared by all creditors or a class of creditors; and
583 “(2) The assignee is personally liable to the assignment estate for a harm shared
584 by all creditors or a class of creditors.
585 “(f) An assignee is not liable if, in the performance of the assignee’s duties and exercise
586 of the assignee’s powers, the assignee relies in good faith on:
587 “(1) A record of the assignor;
588 “(2) Information, an opinion, a report, or a statement presented to the assignee by
25

589 the assignor’s officer or employee, a committee of the assignor’s board of directors, an
590 independent director or manager of the assignor, or another representative of the assignor; or
591 “(3) Information, an opinion, a report, or a statement presented to the assignee by
592 another person that has been selected with reasonable care by or on behalf of the assignee as to a
593 matter the assignee reasonably believes is within the other person’s professional or expert
594 competence.
595 “§ 28-2218. Assignee removal; successor assignee.
596 “(a) The assignor or a creditor may request the Superior Court of the District of Columbia
597 to remove the assignee, if the assignor or creditor has a reasonable belief grounds for removal
598 exist under subsection (b).
599 “(b) After a request under subsection (a) or on the court’s initiative in an action pending
600 before the court under § 28-2221, the court may remove an assignee:
601 “(1) For cause, including the assignee’s fraud, dishonesty, incompetence, gross
602 mismanagement, or failure to comply with this chapter; or
603 “(2) If removal of the assignee best serves the interests of the creditors.
604 “(c) After an assignee resigns, or is removed, dies, or becomes incapacitated, a successor
605 assignee provided for in the assignment agreement becomes the assignee, unless the successor
606 assignee is not eligible to be an assignee under § 28-2204(a) or is subject to removal under
607 subsection (b). A court shall appoint a successor assignee if:
608 “(1) The assignment agreement does not provide for a successor assignee; or
609 “(2) The successor assignee provided for in the assignment agreement is ineligible
610 to be an assignee under § 28-2204(a) or is subject to removal under subsection (b).
611 “(d) Subject to § 28-2217, an assignee that resigns, or is removed, dies, or becomes
26

612 incapacitated, is discharged from the assignee’s duties under this chapter when the assignee, or a
613 representative of a deceased or incapacitated assignee:
614 “(1) Accounts for and turns over to the successor assignee all assets of the
615 assignment estate; and
616 “(2) Submits to creditors a report summarizing the receipts and disbursements
617 made during the service of the assignee.
618 “(e) Subject to an applicable privilege, a court may order an attorney, accountant, or other
619 person that has information in a record relating to the assignment estate or the assignor’s
620 financial affairs to turn over or disclose the record to the successor assignee.
621 “§ 28-2219. Winding up.
622 “(a) On completion of an assignee’s duties, the assignee shall send a creditor whose claim
623 is allowed under § 28-2211, and not satisfied in full, a final accounting sufficient to inform the
624 creditor of all material aspects of the assignment, including:
625 “(1) A description of the actions taken by the assignee under the assignment;
626 “(2) A summary of the assets received by the assignee at the commencement of
627 the assignment and the assets received by the assignee during the assignment;
628 “(3) A summary of disbursements made by the assignee during the assignment for
629 the purpose of administering the assignment estate, including the fees charged by the assignee,
630 and payments to professionals, for rent, and for business purchases;
631 “(4) A summary of collections and dispositions of assets by the assignee;
632 “(5) A summary of distributions made or proposed to be made by the assignee for
633 creditor claims;
634 “(6) A description of additional work to be done by the assignee to complete the
27

635 administration of the assignment estate and the distributions under § 28-2215; and
636 “(7) Other information considered reasonably necessary by the assignee.
637 “(b) Except as otherwise provided in the final accounting or if the assignee has not
638 fulfilled the assignee’s duties under this chapter, the assignee is discharged from the assignee’s
639 duties under this chapter when the assignee sends the final accounting and distributes all the
640 assets of the assignment estate.
641 “(c) If the final accounting describes additional work under subsection (a)(6), the
642 assignee shall exercise the powers appropriate to complete the work.
643 “§ 28-2220. Interstate matters.
644 “(a) Subject to subsection (b), an assignment made under the law of another state must be
645 recognized and enforced on an issue if the result for the issue would be substantially similar to
646 the result for the issue if the assignment had been made under this chapter.
647 “(b) If a claim for wages, salaries, or commissions or a claim of a governmental unit
648 exists in another state, for the purpose of determining the priority of the claim under § 28-
649 2215(f)(2), the assignee shall use the amount asserted or determined under the law of the other
650 state.
651 “(c) If an assignee determines that a creditor should receive the treatment the creditor
652 would receive under an assignment made under the law of another state, the assignee may treat
653 the creditor as the creditor would be treated in the other state.
654 “§ 28-2221. Court action.
655 “(a) The Superior Court of the District of Columbia may hear and resolve a matter
656 involving the administration of an assignment or the exercise of an assignee’s powers and duties,
657 including a request for instructions or approval or to declare rights.
28

658 “(b) Without limiting the rights of the assignee or a creditor or other interested person to
659 request the court to hear or resolve a matter under subsection (a), on request of the assignee, the
660 court may issue an order relating to the administration of the assignment or the exercise of the
661 assignee’s powers and duties, including an order for disposition of an asset or the incurrence of
662 an obligation.
663 “(c) Acceptance of the assignment by the assignee constitutes the assignee’s consent to
664 the jurisdiction of the court.
665 “§ 28-2222. Ancillary assignee.
666 “(a) Subject to other law of the District governing a person from another state serving as
667 a fiduciary in the District, the Superior Court of the District of Columbia may appoint a person
668 serving as an assignee in an assignment in another state, or the person’s nominee, as an ancillary
669 assignee relating to assigned assets located in the District or subject to the jurisdiction of a court
670 in the District, if:
671 “(1) The person or nominee would be eligible to serve as an assignee under § 28-
672 2204; and
673 “(2) The appointment furthers the person’s possession, custody, control, or
674 disposition of an assigned asset under the assignment in the other state.
675 “(b) The court may issue an order that implements an order entered in another state
676 appointing or directing an assignee or otherwise concerning an assignment in the other state.
677 “(c) Unless the court orders otherwise, an ancillary assignee appointed under subsection
678 (a) has the rights, powers, and duties of an assignee appointed under this chapter.
679 “(d) A person in possession, custody, or control of an assigned asset in the District, other
680 than a creditor holding a lien or a right of setoff or recoupment relating to the asset, shall, on
29

681 notification in a record by an ancillary assignee appointed under subsection (a), turn over the
682 asset to the ancillary assignee.
683 “§ 28-2223. Provisions variable by agreement.
684 “(a) Except as provided in this section and § 28-2210(b), the provisions of this chapter
685 may not be varied by agreement.
686 “(b) The duties under § 28-2208(a) and 28-2209(a) may not be disclaimed by agreement.
687 An assignor and the assignee may determine by agreement the standards measuring the
688 fulfillment of the duties of the assignor under § 28-2208 and the assignee under § 28-2209 if the
689 standards are not manifestly unreasonable.
690 “(c) Except as provided in § 28-2217(d), the assignment agreement may limit the
691 assignee’s liability under § 28-2217 and may require the assignee be indemnified by the
692 assignment estate.
693 “(d) Except as provided under § 28-2207(a), whenever this chapter requires an action to
694 be taken within a reasonable time, a time not manifestly unreasonable may be fixed by
695 agreement.
696 “(e) The assignment agreement may provide for duties of the assignee in addition to those
697 in this chapter.
698 “§ 28-2224. Uniformity of application and construction.
699 “In applying and construing this uniform act, a court shall consider the promotion of
700 uniformity of the law among states that enact it.
701 “§ 28-2225. Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.
702 “This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and
703 National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede 15
30

704 U.S.C. § 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. §
705 7003(b).
706 “§ 28-2226. Transitional provision.
707 “This chapter applies to an assignment made on or after the effective date of this
708 chapter.”
709 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
710 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
711 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
712 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
713 Sec. 4. Effective date.
714 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
715 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of Congressional review as
716 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
717 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
718 Columbia Register.
31